South Dakota, session 2026, HB1015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The Unified Judicial System shall conduct a pilot program to allow a committing
magistrate judge or circuit court judge to place a person charged with a misdemeanor or
felony offense under the supervision of a presentence court services officer. The committing
magistrate judge or circuit court judge may impose conditions of release pursuant to § 23A-
43-3.
Section 2. The Unified Judicial System shall report to the Legislature the results of the pilot
program on or before December 31, 2027. The report must include:
(1) Information on any pretrial screenings and assessments completed;
(2) The number of cases supervised;
(3) The number of cases in which the person supervised:
(a) Appeared for all scheduled court appearances;
(b) Was charged with a new criminal offense;
(c) Failed to appear at a court date and a warrant was issued by the court; or
(d) Did not have bond revoked by the court; and
(4) Costs associated with the program.
Section 3. The pilot program will expire on December 31, 2027.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.